New Jersey, session 222, S1307.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section)  a.  No later than five years following the effective date of this act, P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), each county board of elections or superintendent of elections, as the case may be, shall implement the provisions of this act.  A county board of election or superintendent of elections, as the case may be, may implement the provisions of this act at any time during the five-year phase-in of the use of paper ballots and open source voting technology during the conduct of elections in this State. b.    In accordance with the timeframe specified in subsection a. of this section, all voting that occurs at a polling place during the early voting period of an election or on the day of an election shall be conducted using a paper ballot voting system that uses optical scanners or other voting equipment certified for use by the Secretary of State. The optical scanners or other voting equipment certified for use by the Secretary of State shall use open-source software technology.  As used in this subsection, the term open-source means the complete source code for the software technology is available to the public, under the terms of a general public license, to use, modify, or distribute freely without payment of royalties or other considerations. No voting machines or electronic voting system shall be used to record the votes of voters voting during the early voting period of an election or on the day of an election, except that a limited number of voting machines or electronic voting systems shall be available for use by individuals with disabilities. The Secretary of State shall approve and certify for use any voting machine or electronic voting system intended for use by individuals with disabilities, except that the Secretary of State shall not certify for use any voting machine or electronic voting system that uses proprietary or nonpublic software technology. c.    The paper ballot voting system shall: (1)  provide local election officials with the ability to scan and tabulate a hand-marked paper ballot prepared by the voter at the polling place; (2)  provide a record of votes cast for the election; (3)  adhere to any federal laws or regulations concerning voting equipment; and (4)  adhere to any other requirements the Secretary of State deems appropriate for the implementation of a paper ballot voting system in this State. d.    No ballots other than the paper ballots required for use by subsection b. of this section, emergency ballots as provided in P.L.1992, c.3 (C.19:53B-1 et al), and provisional ballots as provided in P.L.1999, c. 232 (C.19:53C-1 et al.), shall be prepared or used at any election in any election district. 2.    (New section)  a.  The Secretary of State shall require each county board of elections or superintendent of elections, as the case may be, to maintain all paper ballots cast in an election under this act, P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), for a period of not less than two years following the date of an election. Thereafter, the ballots may be retained in accordance with procedures set forth by the Secretary of State. b.    Prior to verification of the official election results by a county clerk or superintendent of elections or a municipal clerk, as the case may be, the county clerk or superintendent of elections or municipal clerk shall: (1)  compare and reconcile the record of votes cast provided by the optical scanners or other voting equipment certified by the State with the number of voters who signed in at the polling place and who voted by mail-in, provisional, and military or overseas ballots; (2)  compare and reconcile precinct totals with the totals for that election to ensure that the totals add up to the correct sum; and (3)  review, and account for, all optical scanner or other voting equipment memory cards or flash drives to ensure the memory cards or flash drives are properly loaded into the tally server. 3.    Section 2 of P.L.1976, c.83 (C.19:4-11) is amended to read as follows: 2.  a.  Subject to the provisions of law as to redistricting, each election district [in which only one voting machine or four electronic system voting devices are used] shall contain no more than 750 voters, except an election district in which there is located a public or private institution where persons entitled to vote may reside, and in such district the number of voters shall be as near to 750 as is practicable. b.    Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of this section, no later than January 1, 2006 each election district shall also include at least one voting system capable of permitting individuals with disabilities to vote. (cf: P.L.2005, c.145, s.5) 4.    Section 1 of P.L.2005, c.149 (C.19:12-7.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.  a.  A county board of elections shall have posted a voter information notice, which shall be referred to as a voter's bill of rights, in a conspicuous location in each polling place and each specially designated polling place used for early voting before voting begins. The notice shall contain: the date of the election and the hours during which polling places will be open; a statement that sample ballots are available at the polling place for review by the voter; instruction for the use of the voting [machine] equipment in that polling place and an explanation of what instructions for voting are available at the polling place for the voter; instruction for a voter who is voting for the first time; instruction for a voter who is required to provide identification pursuant to the federal "Help America Vote Act of 2002" and R.S.19:15-17 prior to casting a vote; instruction on how to cast a vote if the voter cannot be present at a polling place on the day of the election; an explanation of the right of the voter to vote in private, regardless of the voter's physical abilities; an explanation of the right of the voter to a provisional ballot, including in the event that a mail-in ballot has been applied for and not received or not transmitted to the county board of elections before the day of any election, and the other circumstances under which a voter has a right to a provisional ballot; an explanation of the right of the voter to receive a replacement ballot for a ballot that has been spoiled, destroyed, lost or never received; an explanation of the right of the voter to ask for and receive assistance in voting; an explanation of the right of the voter to take a reasonable amount of time in casting a vote [on a] using a paper ballot and any voting [machine] equipment at the polling place; an explanation of the right of the voter to bring written material into the polling place for the voter's personal use in casting a vote; instruction on how to contact the appropriate officials if a voter's right to vote or right to otherwise participate in the electoral process has been challenged or violated; general information on federal and State laws that prohibit acts of fraud or misrepresentation and the penalties for those acts; an explanation of the right of the voter to confidentially discover the status of their ballot using the "Track My Ballot" user portal; an explanation that "All ballots are counted and your vote remains anonymous"; an explanation of the right of the voter that if their ballot was rejected, a notice will be issued to the voter within 24 hours after a decision is made to reject the ballot.  The voter will have up to 48 hours prior to the date for the final certification of the results of the election to provide a cure for their ballot; an explanation giving the options for the voter to provide the cure to their rejected ballot; an explanation that no voters shall be intimidated or otherwise unduly influenced by political insignia while voting.  No person shall wear, display, sell, give or provide any political or campaign slogan, badge, button or other insignia associated with any political party or candidate to be worn at or within one hundred feet of the polls or within the polling place or room, on any primary, general or special election day or on any commission government election day, except the badge furnished by the county board as provided by law.  This includes any political gear representing the campaign slogans, logos, or depictions or representations of any political party or candidate such as merchandise sold directly from a political party, campaign, candidate, or by third parties and vendors representing any political party or campaign or candidate.  A person violating any of these provisions is guilty of a disorderly persons offense and will not be permitted on the premises and can only return to vote after the removal of prohibited political insignia; and such other statement, instruction or explanation the Secretary of State may deem appropriate to ensure the full and knowledgeable participation of the voter in the process. The requirement to post this notice in each polling place shall not replace, supersede or void any other requirement set forth in law for the posting of information in each polling place apart from the voter information notice.  The poster promoting the use of voting by mail prepared and distributed by the Secretary of State pursuant to R.S.19:8-6 shall be displayed next to or as close as may be possible to the voter information notice. b.    The Secretary of State shall prescribe the form and specific content of the voter information notice, which may be comprised of more than one page.  If the notice is comprised of more than one page, each page shall be posted separately.  For an election district in which the primary language of 10 percent or more of the registered voters is a language other than English, the Secretary of State shall prescribe an official version of the voter information notice in that other language or languages for use in that election district.  The notice shall be posted in English and in the other language or languages in the polling places in each such district.  The alternate language shall be determined based on information from the latest federal decennial census. c.    A county board of elections may modify or supplement the voter information notice used in a county or municipality to provide additional information specific to that county or a municipality in that county, provided, however, that any such modification or supplementation shall be submitted to the Secretary of State for prior approval. d.    The voter information notice shall be printed on each sample ballot, to the extent practicable, or if not practicable, information on how to view or obtain a copy of the voter information notice shall be printed on each sample ballot. e.    The voter information notice, including one modified or supplemented pursuant to subsection c. of this section, shall be made accessible on the official Internet site of the State by the Secretary of State and each county board of elections shall ensure that the official Internet site of the county contains a link to that notice. f.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2020, c.70) g.    The State shall be liable for the costs incurred by local government entities for compliance with this section, and they shall be reimbursed for those costs, upon application, by the State Treasurer. (cf: P.L.2021, c.40, s.9) 5.    R.S.19:15-17 is amended to read as follows: 19:15-17.  a.  The comparison of signatures of a voter made upon registration and upon election day, and if the voter alleges [his] the voters inability to write, the comparison of the answers made by such voter upon registration and upon election day, shall be had in full view of the challengers. b.    If a voter has registered by mail after January 1, 2003 to vote for the first time in [his or her] the voters current county of residence and did not provide personal identification when registering pursuant to section 16 of P.L.1974, c.30 (C.19:31-6.4), the voter shall be permitted to vote starting at the first election held after January 1, 2004 at which candidates are seeking federal office after displaying one of the following items: (1) a current and valid photo identification card; (2) a current utility bill, bank statement, government check or pay check; (3) any other government document that shows the voter's name and current address; or (4) any other identifying document that the [Attorney General] Secretary of State has determined to be acceptable for this purpose.  If the voter does not display one of these documents, the voter shall [not be permitted to vote by machine but shall] instead be provided with a provisional ballot, pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1999, c.232 (C.19:53C-1 et seq.).  This subsection shall not apply to any voter entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the "Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act" [(42 U.S.C. 1973ff-1 et seq.)] (52 U.S.C. s.20302) or to any voter who is provided the right to vote other than in person under section 3 of Pub.L.98-435, (52 U.S.C. s.20104) the "Voting Accessibility for the Elderly and Handicapped Act," or any other voter entitled to vote otherwise than in person under any other federal law.  This subsection shall also not apply to any person who registers to vote by appearing in person at any voter registration agency or to any person whose voter registration form is delivered to the county commissioner of registration or to the [Attorney General] Secretary of State, as the case may be, through a third party by means other than by mail delivery. c.    Each county commissioner of registration shall collect and maintain, in the manner prescribed by the [Attorney General] Secretary of State, the information provided pursuant to subsection b. of this section and section 16 of P.L.1974, c.30 (C.19:31-6.4).  Access to the personal identification information provided pursuant to subsection b. of this section and section 16 of P.L.1974, c.30 (C.19:31-6.4) [.] shall be prohibited, in accordance with subsection a. of section 6 of P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5). (cf: P.L.2004, c.88, s.9) 6.    R.S.19:15-31 is amended to read as follows: 19:15-31.  [He]  The voter shall then hand the ballot with the coupon undetached to the member of the election board having charge of the ballot box, which member shall call off the number of the ballot and the name of the voter.  If the name and number  agree with the record in the poll book, the election officer having charge of  the poll book shall so announce and place the word "voted" opposite the poll  number to indicate that the person shown thereon as receiving the ballot has voted. In districts having permanent registration the member of the board having charge of the signature copy register shall record the ballot number in the proper column of the record of voting form. The member of the election board in possession of the ballot shall then scan it electronically, if such equipment is available, to ascertain whether the ballot contains any technical errors that would disqualify it from being counted.  If such an error exists, it shall be returned to the voter for correction or if determined to be spoiled, a new ballot shall be given to the voter to enable that person to correct any technical error that would otherwise disqualify the voters vote from being counted.  If a voted ballot is scanned electronically and no technical error is found to exist, the ballot shall be considered valid and shall be counted. (cf: R.S.19:15-31) 7.    Section 1 of P.L.2021, c.40 (C.19:15A-1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  In addition to all other forms of voting provided for by this Title, a registered voter shall be permitted to vote at a specially designated polling place before the day of certain primary and general elections in this State. This procedure shall be known as early voting. The early voting period shall: (1)  start on the 4th calendar day before a non-presidential primary election for a non-presidential general election and end on the second calendar day before that non-presidential primary election; (2)  start on the 6th calendar day before a presidential primary election for a presidential general election and end on the second calendar day before that presidential primary election; or (3)  start on the 10th calendar day before a general election and end on the second calendar day before that general election. The voting process during the early voting period shall be conducted using electronic poll books and optical-scan voting [machines] equipment that [read] reads hand-marked paper ballots or other voting [machines] equipment that produce a voter-verifiable paper ballot, except that no later than five years following the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the voting process during the early voting period shall only be conducted using optical-scan voting equipment that reads hand-marked paper ballots.  Any municipality conducting regular municipal elections in May pursuant to the provisions of the "Uniform Nonpartisan Elections Law," P.L.1981, c.379 (C.40:45-5 et seq.), may, by an ordinance adopted by its governing body, also conduct early voting for the regular municipal election, in accordance with the provisions of this act, P.L.2021, c.40 (C.19:15A-1 et al.). If adopted by a municipal governing body, the early voting period for a regular municipal election in May shall start on the 4th calendar day before the regular municipal election and end on the second calendar day before that regular municipal election. An early voting period shall only be permitted for a non-presidential or presidential primary election and a general election in this State and, if adopted by a municipal governing body, a regular municipal election conducted in May. Pursuant to the provisions of this act and Title 19 of the Revised Statutes and in accordance with procedures that may be established by the Secretary of State for verifying eligible voters, each county board of elections shall verify that a registered voter is qualified to vote in the election and shall prescribe the manner by which a registered voter may vote during such period. b.  (1)  For the primary and the general election, each county board of elections shall designate at least three, but not more than five, public locations within each county as the sites for early voting to occur, except that the county board shall designate at least five, but not more than seven, public locations for early voting if the number of registered voters in the county is at least 150,000 but less than 300,000, and shall designate at least seven, but not more than 10, public locations for early voting if the number of registered voters in the county is 300,000 or more. This provision shall not be interpreted to prevent county boards of elections, at their discretion, from establishing additional locations in excess of the five, seven, or 10 location limits respectively set forth herein; provided, however, that the State shall be required to provide reimbursement for the costs of locations up to and including the five, seven, or 10 respective limits established herein, and shall not be required to provide reimbursement for additional locations beyond those limits under section 6 of this act, P.L.2021, c.40 (C.19:15A-6).  The number of registered voters in each county shall be determined ahead of the selection of early voting sites pursuant to a uniform standard which shall be developed by the Secretary of State through the rulemaking process pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.).  Whenever possible, early voting locations shall be geographically located so as to ensure both access in the part of the county that features the greatest concentration of population, according to the most recent federal decennial census of the United States, and access in various geographic areas of the county.  All early voting locations shall be public facilities, such as county courthouses, public libraries and the offices of the municipal clerk, county clerk, and county board of elections, or places of public accommodation as provided under Title 10 of the Revised Statutes. No public school building and no building used as a public school, as that term is defined under N.J.S.18A:1-1, shall, however, be designated as an early voting location.  The locations shall be designated at the same time as all other polling places are designated by the board of elections.  In the event of a tie vote among members of the county board with respect to the selection of sites for early voting, the county clerk shall cast the deciding vote.  Once early voting locations are designated in each county, county boards of election shall evaluate and, if deemed necessary, revise these locations in order to accommodate significant changes in the number of registered voters within each county, reflect the population distribution and density within each county, or because of similar circumstances.  The Secretary of State may develop the criteria to be used by county boards of election to revise the location of early voting sites and shall prescribe how often such revision shall take place. A voter shall be permitted to vote at any early voting site in the voter's county. (2)  Whenever a municipality that conducts regular municipal elections in May chooses to participate in early voting for the regular municipal election, the county board of elections shall designate at least one public location, but not more than three public locations, within the municipality as the site or sites for early voting to occur. This provision shall not be interpreted to prevent a county board of elections, at its discretion, from establishing additional locations in excess of the three location limit set forth herein; provided, however, that the State shall be required to provide reimbursement for the costs of locations up to and including the three location limit established herein, and shall not be required to provide reimbursement for additional locations beyond that limit under section 6 of this act, P.L.2021, c.40 (C.19:15A-6).  Whenever possible, each such location shall be geographically located in the part of the municipality that features the greatest concentration of population, according to the most recent federal decennial census of the United States.  All early voting locations shall be public facilities, such as municipal courthouses and the offices of the municipal clerk, or places of public accommodation as provided under Title 10 of the Revised Statutes.  No public school building and no building used as a public school, as that term is defined under N.J.S.18A:1-1, shall be designated as an early voting location.  The locations shall be designated at the same time as all other polling places are designated by the board of elections.  In the event of a tie vote among members of the county board with respect to the selection of sites for early voting, the municipal clerk shall cast the deciding vote.  Once early voting locations are designated in each municipality, county boards of election shall evaluate and, if deemed necessary, revise these locations in order to accommodate significant changes in the number of registered voters within each municipality, reflect the population distribution and density within each municipality, or because of similar circumstances.  The Secretary of State may develop the criteria to be used by county boards of election to revise the location of early voting sites and shall prescribe how often such revision shall take place. A voter shall be permitted to vote at any early voting site in the voter's municipality. c.    Each early voting site in a county or municipality shall be open for early voting on Monday through Saturday from at least 10 AM to 8 PM, and on Sunday from at least 10 AM to 6 PM.  Any voter who is on line at the time scheduled for the closing of an early voting site shall be permitted to vote. d.    The election officers responsible for conducting early voting shall be the same as those responsible for conducting a primary and a general election, as appropriate, pursuant to this Title.  The number of such officers and their hours of service shall be as determined by each county board of elections.  The compensation for such officers shall be the same as provided to district board of election members serving at a school election pursuant to R.S.19:45-6, or that required pursuant to Article I, paragraph 23 of the New Jersey Constitution, whichever is greater. e.    The restrictions governing the conduct of voters at a polling place on the days that early voting occurs, the procedures governing who is permitted in a polling place on such occasions and the prohibition on electioneering within 100 feet of a polling place during an election, shall be as provided in chapters 15, 34, 50 and 52 of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes and every other applicable section of this Title. f.     In real time using the electronic poll books each day during the early voting period, and prior to the start of each regularly scheduled primary and general election, and regular municipal election in each non-partisan municipality choosing to participate in early voting, each county board shall make such changes as may be necessary to the voter's record in the Statewide voter registration system to indicate that a voter has voted in that election using the early voting procedure. g.  (1)  Each county board shall be responsible for forming and executing a written plan to ensure, to the greatest extent possible, the integrity of the voting process and the security of ballots used during the early voting period, including the security of voting [machines] equipment, voted ballots, and election records.  The plan shall be based on guidelines established by the Secretary of State and shall be submitted thereto no later than December 15 of each year.  The Secretary of State shall review and, if deemed necessary thereby, require changes to a plan no later than February 1 of each year.  Each plan shall specify a chain of custody and security plan for the voting [machines] equipment, and a chain of custody for the voted ballots and election records and materials, and shall require, among other specifications deemed necessary by the Secretary of State and county boards of election, that all voted ballots shall be transferred at the end of each early voting day to county boards of election for safekeeping.  After the voted ballots are transferred to the county board of elections at the end of each early voting day, a county board may elect to impound those voted ballots on a secure server, or by any other means deemed appropriate by the Secretary of State.  The voted ballots shall not be canvassed until the closing of the polls on election day as required pursuant to section 4 of this act, P.L.2021, c.40 (C.19:15A-4). The results of the voted ballots cast during early voting shall remain confidential and shall be disclosed only in accordance with the provisions of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes, regulations, and guidelines concerning the disclosure of election results, and a violation shall be subject to the penalties established by law. (2)  Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, in the year in which P.L.2021, c.40 (C.19:15A-1 et al.) becomes law, each county board shall submit its plan to the Secretary of State within 30 days following the effective date of this act and the Secretary of State shall review it and, if deemed necessary thereby, require changes in the plan within 45 days following the effective date of this act. h.    Each county board shall make certain that each polling place used for early voting shall be accessible to individuals with disabilities and the elderly, in compliance with the "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990" (42 U.S.C. s.12101 et seq.), and that each polling place provides such voters, including the blind and visually impaired, the same opportunity for access and participation, including privacy and independence, as other voters in compliance with the "Help America Vote Act of 2002" (42 U.S.C. s.15481). i.     The Secretary of State shall establish a printing on demand ballot and elections system.  At a minimum, the system shall be compatible with the Statewide voter registration system established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2005, c.145 (C.19:31-31) and any electronic poll books provided by section 1 of P.L.2019, c.80 (C.19:31-35).  Each polling place used for early voting shall have a computer, tablet, or other electronic device to print provisional ballots for voters required to vote by provisional ballot in accordance with the provisions of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes or due to an equipment malfunction as further provided under section 3 of P.L.2019, c.80 (C.19:31-37), or any other election related material, if needed.  A computer, tablet, or other electronic device and the printer used to print election materials at a polling place shall not be used unless it has been certified by the Secretary of State.  The Secretary of State shall adopt and publish standards and regulations governing the certification and use of computer, tablets, or other electronic devices and printers to print election materials at each polling place used for early voting.  The Secretary of State shall not certify a computer, tablet, or other electronic device or printer unless it is in compliance with the secretary's standards. j.     Each polling place used for early voting shall also have such appropriate supplies, ballots and other materials deemed necessary by the Secretary of State or as is required currently for a polling place on the day of any election by Title 19 of the Revised Statutes. (cf: P.L.2021, c.4, s.1) 8.    Section 1 of P.L.2005, c.145 (C.19:31-31) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  There shall be established in the Department of State a single Statewide voter registration system, as required pursuant to section 303 of the federal "Help America Vote Act of 2002," Pub.L.107-252 (42 U.S.C. s.15483). The principal computer components of the system shall be under the direct control of the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall be responsible for creating the network necessary to maintain the system and providing the computer software, hardware and security necessary to ensure that the system is accessible only to those executive departments and State agencies so designated by the Secretary of State, each county commissioner of registration, each county and municipal clerk, and individuals under certain circumstances, as provided for by this section. The system shall be the official State repository for voter registration information for every legally registered voter in this State, and shall serve as the official voter registration system for the conduct of all elections in the State. b.    The Statewide voter registration system shall include, but not be limited to, the following features: (1)  the name and registration information of every legally registered voter in the State; (2)  the ability to assign a unique identifier to each legally registered voter in the State; (3)  interactivity among appropriate State agencies so designated by the Secretary of State, each county commissioner of registration, each county board of elections, and each county clerk such that these entities shall have immediate electronic access to all or selected records in the system, as determined by the Secretary of State, to receive or transmit all or selected files in the system and to print or review all or selected files in the system; (4)  the ability to permit any county commissioner of registration to enter voter registration information on an expedited basis, and to transfer electronically voter registration information from an online voter registration form completed pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2019, c.382 (C.19:31-6.4c), at the time the information is provided thereto and to permit the Secretary of State to provide technical support to do so whenever needed; (5)  the ability to permit each municipal clerk to view or print information in the system; (6)  the ability to permit an individual, by July 1, 2006, to verify via the Internet whether that individual, and only that individual, is included in the system as a legally registered voter, whether the information pertaining to that individual required by subsection c. of this section is correct, and if not, a means to notify the pertinent county commissioner of registration of the corrections that must be made and to so verify in a way that does not give one individual access to the information required by subsection c. of this section for any other individual; (7)  a Statewide street address index and map in electronic form that can accurately identify the location of every legally registered voter in this State; (8)  the ability to record and monitor all requests for mail-in ballots; to enable the county clerk to verify the identity and signature of each person requesting a mail-in ballot; to record the name and address of each voter determined to be eligible to receive a mail-in ballot for a particular election and to note when a mail-in ballot has been transmitted to that voter by mail or hand delivery; to update the system to allow the postal tracking of mail-in ballots using Intelligent Mail barcodes, or a similar successor tracking system, upon the finding by the Secretary of State that such technology is viable; and to make such information available to the Secretary of State so that a voter can be notified whether the application for such a ballot was accepted or rejected, and the reason for the rejection, using the free-access system established by section 5 of P.L.2004, c.88 (C.19:61-5); and (9)  any other functions required pursuant to Pub.L.107-252 (42 U.S.C. s.15301 et seq.), or Title 19 of the Revised Statutes, or that may be deemed necessary by the Secretary of State. c.    The Statewide voter registration system shall include, but not be limited to, the following information for every legally registered voter in this State: (1)  last, first and middle name; (2)  street address at time of registration or rural route, box number or apartment number, if any; (3)  city or municipality, and zip code; (4)  date of birth; (5)  telephone number and e-mail address, if provided on voter registration form; (6)  previous name or address if individual re-registered due to change of name or address; (7)  ward and election district number, if either is available; (8) (a) current and valid New Jersey driver's license number; or (b)  if the registrant has not been issued a New Jersey driver's license number, the last four digits of the registrant's social security number; or (c)   unique identifying number for any individual who has not been issued the information sought in subparagraph (a) or (b) of this paragraph; (9)  notation that a copy of one of the following documents has been submitted with the voter registration application, if required: current and valid photo identification card; a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, pay check or any other government document showing the registrant's name and current address; (10)   the method by which the individual registered and whether that person needs to provide additional identification information to vote using a [voting machine] paper ballot instead of a provisional ballot; (11)   political party affiliation, if designated; (12)   digitized signature; (13)   date of registration or re-registration; (14)   name and street address of the individual assisting in the completion of the form, if the applicant for registration is unable to do so; (15)   voting participation record for ten-year period; and (16)   any other information required pursuant to Pub.L.107-252 (42 U.S.C. s.15301 et seq.), or Title 19 of the Revised Statutes, or that the Secretary of State determines is necessary to assess the eligibility of an individual to be registered to vote and to vote in this State. (cf: P.L.2019, c.382, s.4) 9.    R.S.19:32-2 is amended to read as follows: 19:32-2.  a.  Except as provided in section 2 of P.L.1982, c.46 (C.19:32-1.2), each superintendent may appoint a chief deputy, a chief clerk, a secretary, such personnel as is authorized under R.S.19:48-6, and any other assistants [he] the superintendent considers necessary to carry out the provisions of this Title, and, except as hereinafter provided, may remove the same whenever [he] the superintendent deems it necessary and all persons so appointed, by superintendents of elections in counties of the first class having more than 850,000 inhabitants, according to the latest federal census taken in a year ending in zero, to serve for terms of more than six months in any one year, shall be in the classified service of the civil service and shall be appointed in accordance with and shall be subject to the provisions of Title 11A, Civil Service, but all other persons so appointed shall not be subject to any of the provisions of Title 11A, Civil Service, but shall be in the unclassified service.  All persons appointed by the commissioner of registration in counties of the first class having more than 600,000, but less than 850,000 inhabitants, according to the latest federal census taken in a year ending in zero, to serve for terms of more than six months in any one year, other than the chief deputy and chief clerk and confidential secretary and chief custodian, shall be in the classified service of the civil service and shall be appointed, and hold their position, in accordance with the provisions of Title 11A, Civil Service, but all other persons so appointed shall not be subject to any of the provisions of Title 11A, Civil Service, but shall be in the unclassified service. Subject to the provisions of subsection b. of this section, the salaries of the persons so appointed shall be fixed and such salaries certified to and approved under his hand shall be paid semimonthly by the county treasurer of the county in which such persons are so engaged.  All other necessary expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this Title, when certified to and approved by the superintendent, shall be paid by the county treasurer of the county in which the superintendent shall maintain [his] the superintendents office; provided, however, that all necessary expenses incurred by the commissioner of registration, the superintendent of elections, and the custodian of voting [machines] equipment in the counties of the first class for the proper performance of all of his duties of all his offices as set forth in Title 19, shall not exceed, in the aggregate, the sum of $2,000,000.00 for the year 1998 or that sum, as adjusted, for each year thereafter.  The governing body of the county may increase the sum but the increase shall not exceed 5% or the index rate, whichever is less, over the previous year's sum.  As used in this section, "index rate" means the rate of annual percentage increase, rounded to the nearest half-percent, in the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services, computed and published quarterly by the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of Economic Analysis, which annual increase shall be calculated on the basis of the second quarter which occurred in the next preceding local budget year.  The Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs shall promulgate annually, on or before October 1, the index rate to apply in the next following local budget year. b.    The superintendent shall determine the amount of the salary to be paid to each person appointed by the superintendent, and shall submit the proposed salaries to the governing body for review and approval.  Following the review and approval of the governing body, the salaries shall be fixed and shall be paid to those persons pursuant to the provisions of subsection a. of this section. (cf: P.L.2015, c.250, s.3) 10.  Section 24 of P.L.1947, c.167 (C.19:32-49) is amended to read as follows: 24.  In addition to the foregoing, the superintendent of elections is constituted the commissioner of registration for the county and [he] the superintendent of elections shall, within the county, have and exercise all the powers of, and be charged with all the duties had and exercised and required to be performed by, the superintendent of elections and the commissioner of registration in any county, including the custody and control of voting [machines] equipment heretofore or hereafter installed in the county in any manner provided by law, except those heretofore or hereafter installed in any municipality by the governing body thereof, which shall be placed and remain in the custody of the municipal clerk unless taken over by the county according to law.  The deputy superintendent of elections in counties of the first class, and in counties of the second and fifth classes in which the governing body has established the office of superintendent of elections for the county, is constituted the deputy commissioner of registration. (cf: P.L.2021, c.58, s.2) 11.  Section 28 of P.L.1947, c.167 (C.19:32-53) is amended to read as follows: 28.  Upon the taking effect of such resolution the county board of elections of the county shall turn over to the superintendent of elections all voting [machines] equipment of the county with the keys thereto, and all records, books, binders, folders, files, card indexes, documents and forms, used or unused, relating to or used or useful in connection with the registration of voters, or the use of voting [machines] equipment, in the county, together with all racks, cabinets, furniture, equipment and supplies used or useful for the filing, storing, repair servicing  or use of the same. (cf: P.L.1947, s.167, s.28) 12.  R.S.19:50-3 is amended to read as follows: 19:50-3.  [For instructing the voters on any election day there shall, so far as practicable, be provided by the county board of elections or the superintendent of elections or the municipal clerk, as the case may be, having custody of voting machines, for each polling place a mechanically operated model of a portion of the face of the machine.  Such model, if furnished, shall, during the election, be located on the district election officers' table or in some other place which the voters must pass to reach the machine, and each voter shall, before entering the voting machine booth, be instructed regarding the operation of the machine and such instruction illustrated on the model, and the voter given opportunity to personally operate the modeL.   The voter's attention shall also be called to the diagram of the face of the machine so that the voter can become familiar with the location of the questions and the names of the officers and candidates.] If any voter, before entering the voting [machine] booth, declares under oath, and establishes to the satisfaction of a majority of all the members of the district board that by reason of an inability to read or write, blindness or other physical disability [he] the voter is unable to cast [his] the voters vote without assistance, [he] the voter shall have the assistance of two members of the board of opposite political faith, to be assigned by the board.  Such members shall retire with such voter to the booth and assist [him] the voter. The member acting as clerk of the district board shall make an entry on a disability certificate for assistance, which entry shall be on the form of an oath inserted in the front of the duplicate registry binders at each election. In every instance when such oath is administered to a voter as herein provided, it shall state briefly what facts were sworn to and the names of the members of the board who aided such voter shall be signed on the form. Any members of the district board shall be eligible to assist any such voter, but no other person except as hereinafter provided shall be allowed to assist [him] the voter. No member of the board shall reveal the name of any person for whom such voter has voted or anything that took place while [he] the voter was being assisted. Such voter, if blind, disabled or unable to read or write, may, in lieu of the assistance of the board as above provided, have assistance of some person of [his] the voters own selection.  Such person shall retire with such voter to the booth and assist [him] the voter in voting.  The name and address of such person shall be recorded as above.  In such case, no other person than the one so selected by the voter shall be allowed to assist such voter.  No person so selected shall reveal the name of any person for whom such voter has voted or anything that took place while [he] the voter was being assisted. The disability certificates shall be numbered serially 1 to 20.  The commissioner of registration shall furnish sufficient disability certificates for assistance for each election district in [his] the commissioners county which shall be inserted in the front of the duplicate registry binders. (cf: P.L.1985, c.20, s.2) 13.  R.S.19:52-1 is amended to read as follows: 19:52-1.  The district boards of each election district shall meet at the polling place three-quarters of an hour before the time set for opening of the polls at each election and shall proceed to arrange the furniture, stationery and voting [machine or machines] equipment for the conduct of the election.  The district boards shall then and there have the voting [machine,] equipment, ballots, and stationery required to be delivered to them for such election by the officials charged by law with that duty. The keys to the voting [machine] equipment shall be delivered to the district election officers in any manner that the county board of elections or the superintendent of elections or the municipal clerk, as the case may be, having custody of voting [machines] equipment, may determine, at least three-quarters of an hour before the time set for opening the polls, in a sealed envelope, on which shall be written or printed the number and location of the voting [machine] equipment, the number of the seal with which it is sealed, the number of the green seal with which the emergency ballot box is sealed, and the number registered on the protective counter or device, as reported by the custodian. The envelope containing the keys shall not be opened until at least two members of the board who are not members of the same political party shall be present at the polling place and shall have examined the envelope to see that it has not been opened.  Before opening the envelope all election officers present shall examine the number on the seal on the [machine] equipment and the number registered on the protective counter, and shall ascertain if they are the same as the numbers written on the envelope; and if they are not the same, the [machine] equipment must not be [opened] used until such county board of elections or such superintendent of elections or such municipal clerk, as the case may be, after due notice of such discrepancy, shall have caused such [machine] equipment to be re-examined and properly arranged by any person or persons employed or appointed pursuant to R.S.19:48-6.  If the numbers on the voting [machine seal] equipment and the protective counter are found to agree with the numbers on the envelope, the district election officers shall proceed to open the doors concealing the counters, and each district election officer shall carefully examine every counter and ascertain whether or not it registers zero (000), and the same shall be subject to the inspection of official watchers. In addition, each district election officer shall carefully examine the emergency ballot box to ascertain whether or not it is properly sealed with a numbered green seal [and examine the number to ascertain if it is the same as the number written on the voting machine key envelope]. If [the numbers are not the same] tampering is suspected, the county board of elections, the superintendent of elections, or the municipal clerk, as the case may be, shall be notified of the discrepancy. The [machine] voting equipment shall remain locked against voting until the polls are formally opened and shall not be operated except by voters in voting.  If any counter is found not to register zero (000) the district board shall immediately notify such county board of elections or such superintendent of elections or such municipal clerk, as the case may be, who shall, if practicable, cause such counter to be adjusted at zero (000) by any person or persons employed or appointed pursuant to R.S.19:48-6.  If it shall be impracticable for such person or persons to arrive in time to so adjust such counter before the time set for opening the polls, the district election officers shall immediately make a written statement of the designating letter and number of such counter, together with the number registered thereon, and shall sign and post same upon the wall of the polling room, where it shall remain throughout election day, and in filling out the statement of canvass, they shall subtract such number from the number registered thereon at the close of the polls. Each district election officer shall carefully examine the provisional ballot bag to ascertain that it is properly sealed with a numbered security seal and whether it has been subjected to tampering.  If the elections officer discovers evidence of tampering, the county board of elections, the superintendent of elections, or the municipal clerk, as the case may be, shall be so notified immediately. (cf: P.L.1999, c.232, s.6) 14.  R.S.19:52-3 is amended to read as follows: 19:52-3.  Where a voter [presents himself] is present at a polling place for the purpose of voting, the election officer shall follow the procedure as now required by this title regarding the eligibility of a person to vote.  If such eligibility is established, one of the district election officers shall announce the name of the voter and permit [him] the voter to pass to the voting booth [of the voting machine] for the purpose of casting his vote.  No voter shall remain in the voting [machine] booth longer than two minutes, and having cast [his] a vote the voter shall at once emerge therefrom and leave the polling room; if [he] the voter shall refuse to leave after the lapse of two minutes [he] the voter shall be removed by the district election officers.  Such election officers shall ascertain the name and address of each voter in the manner now provided by law before [he] the voter enters the voting [machine] booth for the purpose of voting.  No voter after having entered and emerged from the voting [machine] booth shall be permitted to reenter the same on any pretext whatever.  Only one voter at a time shall be permitted in the voting [machine] booth to vote.  However, a voter shall be permitted to be accompanied into the voting [machine] booth by a dependent child. (cf: P.L.1994, c.154 s.2) 15.  R.S.19:53-1 is amended to read as follows: 19:53-1.  Any unauthorized person found in possession of any [such] voting [machine] equipment in use or to be used in any election, or keys thereof, shall be guilty of a crime of the fourth degree.  Any person willfully tampering or attempting to tamper with, disarrange, deface or impair in any manner whatsoever, or destroy any [such] voting [machine] equipment while the same is in use at any election, or who shall, after such [machine] equipment is locked in order to preserve the registration or record of any election made by the same, tamper or attempt to tamper with any such voting [machine] equipment, shall be guilty of a crime of the third degree. (cf: P.L.2005, c.154, s.53) 16.  Section 10 of P.L.1992, c.3 (C.19:53B-1) is amended to read as follows: 10.  a.  The county clerk or the municipal clerk, in the case of a municipal election, shall prepare an emergency ballot box packet which shall include the appropriate number of emergency ballots, the appropriate number of pre-punched single-hole white envelopes, and two tally sheets, each with a carbon duplicate copy attached. The custodian of the voting [machines] equipment shall prepare and place in each emergency ballot box an emergency ballot box packet and an envelope containing a numbered white seal and a numbered red seal.  The envelope shall contain, on its face, the instructions for the use of the seals, the number and the election district location of the voting [machine] equipment to which the ballot box is attached, and the identification numbers of the white and red seals that were placed in the envelope.  The emergency ballot box shall be sealed with a numbered green security seal before being shipped to each election district as provided in R.S.19:48-6. b.    For the primary for the general election, the emergency ballots shall be printed on paper of a color that matches the color of the voting authority, which shall indicate the party primary of the voter.  The emergency ballots shall be uniform in size, quality and type and of a thickness that the printing thereon cannot be distinguished from the back of the paper, and without any mark, device or figure on the front or back other than as provided in this amendatory and supplementary act, P.L.1992, c.3 (C.19:53B-1 et al.). The clerk of the county or municipality having custody of the emergency ballots shall prepare each emergency ballot package with a minimum of 30 emergency ballots for each political party.  If the clerk determines, based upon the number of registered voters with party affiliations, that an election district shall require more than 30 emergency ballots per party primary, additional emergency ballots shall be delivered to that election district. c.    For the general election the emergency ballots shall be printed on paper of the color of the voting authority.  The emergency ballots shall be uniform in size, quality and type and of a thickness that the printing thereon cannot be distinguished from the back of the paper, and without any mark, device or figure on the front or back other than as provided in this amendatory and supplementary act. The clerk of the county or municipality shall prepare each emergency ballot package with a minimum of 30 emergency ballots.  If the clerk determines that an election district shall require more than 30 emergency ballots based on the number of registered voters, additional emergency ballots shall be delivered to that election district. (cf: P.L.1992, c.3, s.10) 17.  Section 12 of P.L.1992, c.3 (C.19:53B-3) is amended to read as follows: 12.  a.  If for any cause [a voting machine] any voting equipment fails to operate or the paper ballots supplied by the county clerk are unusable, the district board shall use the supply of emergency ballots that are on hand at the opening of the polls.  The mode and manner of voting the emergency ballots shall in all respects conform as nearly as possible to the mode and manner of voting herein described. b.  If for any reason emergency ballots shall not be ready or available for distribution at any polling place, or if the supply of emergency ballots shall be exhausted before the polls are closed, the district board member in charge shall notify the appropriate authority that additional ballots shall be required. (cf: P.L.1992, c.3, s.12) 18.  Section 13 of P.L.1992, c.3 (19:53B-4) is amended to read as follows: 13.  If it becomes necessary to use the emergency ballot box, and if the numbers on the green seal and the voting [machine] equipment key envelope were identical when previously examined as provided in R.S.19:52-1, the judge of the district board shall remove the emergency ballots and the envelope containing the numbered white and red seals from the box; shall open the envelope, remove the seals, compare the numbers on the seals with those on the face of the envelope, and note on the envelope any discrepancies; shall place the red seal back in the envelope and return the envelope to the ballot box; and shall, in an open and public manner, exhibit the emergency ballot box so that those present may see that the box is now empty except for the envelope containing the numbered red seal.  The judge shall close and re-seal the emergency ballot box with the numbered white seal removed from the envelope in the box, leaving open the aperture in the lid thereof. If the numbers on the green seal and the voting [machine] equipment key envelope were not identical when previously examined as provided in R.S.19:52-1 but the appropriate county board of elections, superintendent of elections, or municipal clerk, as the case may be, has authorized the use of the emergency ballot box, the emergency ballot box may be opened and handled in the manner prescribed above.  If the appropriate county board, superintendent, or municipal clerk, as the case may be, has not yet authorized the use of the emergency ballot box, the appropriate county board, superintendent, or municipal clerk shall again be notified and the emergency ballot box shall not be opened until that county board, superintendent, or municipal clerk authorizes the use of the box. (cf: P.L.1992, c.3, s.13) 19.  Section 14 of P.L.1992, c.3 (C.19:53B-5) is amended to read as follows: 14.  After the district board ascertains that a voter is properly registered and qualified to vote, the member of the board charged with maintaining the signature copy register shall require the voter to sign the signature copy register and shall have the voter sign the part of the two-part perforated voting authority that shall remain bound in the pad. The member shall record the voting authority number in the proper column of the signature copy register, except that in a primary for the general election, the member shall also record the party primary in which the voter voted. In the proper columns, the voter shall sign the reverse side of the signature copy register and the board member shall initial the signature of the voter. After the voter signs the voting authority, the member of the board in charge of the signature copy register shall give the voter the unsigned portion of the two-part voting authority.  The voter shall return that portion to the district election board member in charge of the operation of the voting [machine] equipment at that time. The member shall place each authority in consecutive order on a string or wire prior to furnishing a voter with an emergency ballot and a plain white single-hole punched envelope. No emergency ballot shall be handed to a voter until there is a polling booth ready for occupancy or, if a booth is unusable, the area designated for voters to mark the emergency ballot is ready.  If a voting area is used, the voter shall be provided with a privacy screen at the same time that the emergency ballot is provided. The inspector shall instruct the voter how to place the voted emergency ballot into the pre-punched single-hole plain white envelope. (cf: P.L.1992, c.3, s.14) 20.  Section 19 of P.L.1992, c.3 (C.19:53B-10) is amended to read as follows: 19.  After voting the emergency ballot and before leaving the polling booth or the designated voting area, as the case may be, the voter shall place the voted emergency ballot in the pre-punched single-hole plain white envelope.  The voter shall seal the envelope and shall retain custody of the envelope until the member of the board having charge of the voting [machine] equipment at that time is ready to accept the envelope. (cf: P.L.1992, c.3, s.19) 21.  Section 20 of P.L.1992, c.3 (C.19:53B-11) is amended to read as follows: 20.  The voter shall hand the sealed envelope to the member of the election board having charge of the voting [machine] equipment. The member shall keep the sealed white envelope in full view of the voter, the other district board members and all other persons present until it is deposited in the ballot box. The voter may also take hold of the envelope, with that member of the board, until the emergency ballot is deposited into the emergency ballot box. (cf: P.L.1992, c.3, s.20) 22.  Section 21 of P.L.1992, c.3 (C.19:53B-12) is amended to read as follows: 21.  The right to challenge a voter who uses the emergency ballot shall exist until the emergency ballot is deposited in the emergency ballot box.  If the right of a person to vote is challenged, the same procedures shall be used as prescribed when the right of a person to cast a vote [on an electronic voting machine] using any voting equipment or by paper ballot is challenged. (cf: P.L.2004, c.88, s.21) 23.  Section 29 of P.L.1992, c.3 (C.19:53B-20) is amended to read as follows: 29.  When district board members have processed both voted and non-voted emergency ballots, the ballots shall remain sealed within the box for a period of 15 calendar days, which shall begin on the first business day after the day of the election, except that if a judge of the Superior Court issues a court order to open the box within the 15-day period, the box shall be opened. On the first business day after the 15-day period, the custodian of the voting [machines] equipment shall break the numbered security seals and the emergency ballot boxes shall be opened.  All voted emergency ballots located within an emergency ballot box shall be removed from the box and shall be placed in a container or an envelope and sealed.  The front of each container or envelope shall contain the number of the voting [machine] equipment, the name of the municipality and the ward or district number where the [machine] equipment was located during the election.  The commissioner of registration shall preserve the containers or envelopes and the contents of the containers or envelopes for a period of two years from the date that the election occurred. (cf: P.L.1992, c.3, s.29) 24.  Section 14 of P.L.1981, c.379 (C.40:45-18) is amended to read as follows: 14.  Notwithstanding the provisions of section 13 of P.L.1981, c.379 (C.40:45-17), if the voters of any municipality shall adopt the proposition of holding run-off elections in the municipality, either prior to or subsequent to May 2, 1990, at the regular municipal election held in that municipality the candidates receiving the greatest number and a majority of votes cast shall be elected to the respective offices, except that if: a. Nine councilmen-at-large (or commissioners, or village trustees) are to be elected and four or more candidates for that office receive a majority of the votes cast, the nine candidates receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected; or b. Eight councilmen-at-large (or commissioners, or village trustees) are to be elected and four or more candidates for that office receive a majority of the votes cast, the eight candidates receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected; or c. Seven councilmen-at-large (or commissioners, or village trustees) are to be elected and three or more candidates for that office receive a majority of the votes cast, the seven candidates receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected; or d.    Six councilmen-at-large (or commissioners, or village trustees) are to be elected and three or more candidates for that office receive a majority of the votes cast, the six candidates receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected; or e.    Five councilmen-at-large (or commissioners, or village trustees) are to be elected and two or more candidates for that office receive a majority of the votes cast, the five candidates receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected; or f.     Four councilmen-at-large (or commissioners, or village trustees) are to be elected and two or more candidates for that office receive a majority of the votes cast, the four candidates receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected; or g.    Three councilmen-at-large (or commissioners, or village trustees) are to be elected and one or more candidates for that office receive a majority of the votes cast, the three candidates receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected; or h.    Two councilmen-at-large (or commissioners, or village trustees) are to be elected and one or more candidates for that office receive a majority of the votes cast, the two candidates receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected. For the purpose of this section, the number constituting a majority of the votes cast shall be computed by dividing by two the number of voters who cast a vote for at least one candidate for councilman-at-large (or commissioner, or village trustee) and then adding one.  [Voting machines to be used in the election shall be equipped, as soon as practicable, with one or more counters so connected as to keep a tally of the number of voters who cast votes for one or more of the candidates for councilman-at-large (or commissioner, or village trustee).  Until suitable counters have been provided, or whenever] Whenever the tally of the number of voters cannot be determined for any reason, then the number constituting the majority of the votes cast shall be computed by adding all the votes cast for each candidate for that office, dividing that total by twice the number of councilmen-at-large (or commissioners, or village trustees) to be elected and then adding one. (cf: P.L.1995, c.97, s.2) 25.  Section 3 of P.L.2015, c.249 (C.40A:4-45.45b) is amended to read as follows: 3.  a.  A budget request submitted to the county governing body by a county entity budget authority on behalf of a county entity shall be comprised of two parts: the amount to be raised by property taxation, and the amount to be funded wholly through federal or State funds, fees raised by the county entity, or other sources. b.    In the preparation of the portion of its budget request to be raised by property taxation, a county entity budget authority shall limit any increase in that portion of its budget request to 2.0% of the previous year's budget request, subject to the exclusions set forth in subsection b. of section 10 of P.L.2007, c.62 (C.40A:4-45.45), except that election expenses shall be exempt from the requirements of this subsection.  For purposes of this subsection, "election expenses" shall mean and include all necessary expenses incurred by the superintendent of elections, county clerk, and board of elections for each county related to election costs and the administration, preparation, and implementation of all elections, including all vendor related contract services; voting [machine] equipment maintenance, repairs[,] parts [and equipment], certification, and technical coding; transportation of voting [machines] and election supplies; overtime for all staff related to election duty; food services during election; poll workers, [machine] equipment technicians, and other temporary workers; supplies; office equipment; printing; postage; advertisement costs, upon being certified to by the superintendent of elections, county clerk, and board of elections for each county; but shall not mean or include staff salaries for the office of the superintendent of elections, staff salaries for the county clerk, or staff salaries for the county board of elections. c.    Nothing in P.L.2015, c.249 (C.40A:4-45.45b et al.) shall diminish the obligations of a county under a collective bargaining agreement with its employees in force on the effective date of P.L.2015, c.249 (C.40A:4-45.45b et al.). (cf: P.L.2015, c.249, s.3) 26.  (New section)  Upon application for reimbursement by a county governing body to the Secretary of State and approval of the application by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, a county shall be reimbursed by the State for the cost of implementing the provisions of this act, P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 27.  On the last day of the fifth year following the effective date of this act, P.L.    , c.    (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the following sections are repealed: Section 3 of P.L.1976, c.83 (C.19:4-12); R.S.19:47-1 and R.S.19:47-2; R.S.19:48-1 through R.S.19:48-3; Sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1940, c.197 (C.19:48-3.1 and 19:48-3.2); Sections 1 through 12 of P.L.1944, c.7 (C.19:48-3.3 through 19:48-3.14); Sections 1 through 7 of P.L.1945, c.59 (C.19:48-3.15 through 19:48-3.21); R.S.19:48-4 through R.S.19:48-8; R.S.19:49-1 through R.S.19:49-5; R.S.19:50-2; R.S.19:52-5 and R.S.19:52-6; Section 2 of P.L.1955, c.260 (C.19:52-6.1); R.S.19:52-7; and N.J.S.40A:14-75. 28.  (New section)  There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of State such sums as the State Treasurer and the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting deem necessary to effectuate the purposes of section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.       )(pending before the Legislature as this bill) and for the reimbursements provided in section 26 of P.L.    , c.    (C.      )(pending before the Legislature as this bill). 29.  Notwithstanding the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to the contrary, the Secretary of State, immediately upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law and within six months of the effective date of this act, shall adopt such rules and regulations as the secretary deems necessary or proper to implement the provisions of this act.  The rules and regulations shall be effective as regulations immediately upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law and shall be effective for a period not to exceed 18 months, and may, thereafter, be amended, adopted or readopted by the Secretary of State in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). 30.  This act shall take effect immediately.